Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.230

Board—Powers and duties.

The board has the following powers and duties:

(1) Develop and recommend to the legislature policies to encourage competition and to further enhance the quality, efficiency, and accountability of and equitable participation by small, minority, women, or veteran-owned businesses in capital construction projects through the use of traditional and alternative delivery methods in Washington, and make recommendations regarding best practices, expansion, continuation, elimination, or modification of the alternative public works contracting methods, including specific recommendations for reducing barriers for and increasing participation by small, minority, women, or veteran-owned businesses;

(2) Evaluate the use of existing contracting procedures and the potential future use of other alternative contracting procedures including competitive negotiation contracts;

(3) Submit recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature evaluating alternative contracting procedures that are not authorized under this chapter;

(4) Appoint members of committees; and

(5) Direct the department of enterprise services to collect quantitative and qualitative data on alternative public works contracting procedures to support the board's work in meeting the purpose established in RCW 39.10.220(1).

[ 2023 c 395 s 7; 2021 c 230 s 3; 2013 c 222 s 3; 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 3; 2009 c 75 s 1; 2007 c 494 s 103; 2005 c 377 s 2. Formerly RCW 39.10.810.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2023 c 395 ss 1-30, 32-34, 36, and 37: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Findings—Intent—2023 c 395: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Effective date—2021 c 230: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 39.10.200.